static/hunspell/29.12.2023/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX N34 ек кендәгегәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгегәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгегәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемдәгенесе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгенесе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кендәгенесе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгенесе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгенесе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемдәгенәнсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгенәнсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кендәгенәнсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгенәнсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгенәнсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемдәгеләсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгеләсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кендәгеләсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгеләсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгеләсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемдәгеме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгеме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N34 ек кендәгеме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгеме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгеме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX N34 ек кемдәгелер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгелер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N34 ек кендәгелер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгелер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгелер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX N34 ек кемдәгесе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгесе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кендәгесе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгесе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгесе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемдәгеләй .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгеләй .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N34 ек кендәгеләй .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгеләй .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгеләй .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX N34 ек кемдәгесә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгесә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N34 ек кендәгесә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгесә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгесә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX N34 ек кемдәгеләйме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгеләйме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N34 ек кендәгеләйме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгеләйме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгеләйме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX N34 ек кемдәгесәме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгесәме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N34 ек кендәгесәме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгесәме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгесәме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX N34 ек кемдәгеләйҙер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгеләйҙер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N34 ек кендәгеләйҙер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгеләйҙер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгеләйҙер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX N34 ек кемдәгесәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгесәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N34 ек кендәгесәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгесәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгесәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX N34 ек кемдәгеләйсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгеләйсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кендәгеләйсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгеләйсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгеләйсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемдәгесәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңдәгесәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кендәгесәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙҙәгесәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙҙәгесәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кемәсә .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX N34 ек кеңәсә .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX N34 ек кенәсә .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX N34 ек кебеҙгәсә .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX N34 ек кегеҙгәсә .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX N34 ек кемәсәме .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N34 ек кеңәсәме .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N34 ек кенәсәме .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N34 ек кебеҙгәсәме .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N34 ек кегеҙгәсәме .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX N34 ек кемәсәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N34 ек кеңәсәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N34 ек кенәсәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N34 ек кебеҙгәсәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N34 ек кегеҙгәсәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX N34 ек кемәсәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кеңәсәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кенәсәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кебеҙгәсәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек кегеҙгәсәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек екме/O34 .	+Q
SFX N34 ек ектер .	+Indf
SFX N34 ек ексе .	+Clt/сы
SFX N34 ек ектеке/O39 .	+Poss
SFX N34 ек еккәй/O43 .	+Dim
SFX N34 ек ектәй/O45 .	+Der/дай
SFX N34 ек ексә/O47 .	+Der/са
SFX N34 ек ектәге/O49 .	+Der/дағы
SFX N34 ек екле/O51 .	+Der/лы
SFX N34 ек кһеҙ/O55 .	+Abe
SFX N34 ек ккәсә/O59 .	+Der/ҡаса
